New York, session 2025-2026, S9441.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The multiple dwelling law is amended by adding a new 2 section 69 to read as follows: 3 § 69. Fire extinguishers required in certain dwellings. In a city with 4 a population of one million or more, standards for installation of fire 5 extinguishers requiring that every living unit not occupied by the owner 6 of such living unit, which shall include but not be limited to, a one- 7 six family dwelling, or any dwelling accommodation located in a building 8 owned as a condominium or cooperative in the state or any multiple 9 dwellings shall have installed an operable fire extinguisher of such 10 manufacture, design and installation standards as are established by the 11 state fire prevention and building code council. For purposes of this 12 section, multiple dwelling means a dwelling which is either rented or 13 leased to be occupied, or is occupied as the temporary or permanent 14 residence or home of one or more families living independently of each 15 other, including but not limited to the following: a tenement, flat 16 house, maisonette apartment, apartment house, apartment hotel, tourist 17 house, bachelor apartment, studio apartment, duplex apartment, kitchen- 18 ette apartment, hotel, lodging house, rooming house, boarding house, 19 boarding and nursery school, furnished room house, club, sorority house, 20 fraternity house, college and school dormitory, convalescent, old age or 21 nursing homes or residences. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 23 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15145-01-6